Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-525 Fees. (a) Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (e), the fee for filing and indexing a record
under this part, other than an initial financing statement of the kind
described in section 490:9-502(c), shall be as specified by rules adopted under
section 502-25 by the department of land and natural resources pursuant to
chapter 91.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(e), the fee for filing and indexing an initial financing statement of the kind
described in section 490:9-502(c) shall be as specified by rules adopted under
section 502-25 by the department of land and natural resources pursuant to
chapter 91.

(c) The number of names required to be indexed
does not affect the amount of the fee in subsections (a) and (b).

(d) The fee for responding to a request for
information from the filing office, including for issuing a certificate showing
whether there is on file any financing statement naming a particular debtor
shall be as specified by rules adopted under section 502-25 by the department
of land and natural resources pursuant to chapter 91.

(e) This section does not require a fee with
respect to a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement
filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted
collateral or timber to be cut under section 490:9-502(c). However, the
recording and satisfaction fees that otherwise would be applicable to the
record of the mortgage apply. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next